Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB355.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of December 17, 1968 (P.L.1224, No.387), known as the Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Law, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 3.2. Online Access Control Measures.--(a) Except as provided in subsection (b), it shall be unlawful for any person in this Commonwealth to:(1) Use or cause to be used a software application that runs automated tasks over the Internet to access a computer, computer network or computer system, or any part of a computer, computer network or computer system, for the purpose of purchasing tickets with the intent to resell the tickets.12345678910111213141516171819 (2) Use or cause to be used a software application that runs automated tasks over the Internet and that circumvents or disables any electronic queues, waiting periods or other sales volume limitation systems associated with online ticket sales for events, or uses or causes to be used multiple email addresses or Internet service providers to circumvent or disable the systems.(3) Use or cause to be used a software application that runs automated tasks over the Internet to circumvent or disable a security measure, access control system or other technological control or measure on an Internet website or online service that is used by the operator to facilitate authorized entry into an event.(4) Sell or offer to sell any product or service obtained in violation of paragraph (1), (2) or (3) if the person selling or offering to sell the product or service:(i) participated directly in or had the ability to control the conduct in violation of paragraph (1), (2) or (3); or(ii) knew or should have known that the product or service was acquired in violation of paragraph (1), (2) or (3).(b) It shall not be unlawful under this act for a person to create or use any computer software or system to:(1) investigate or further the enforcement or defense of any alleged violation of this section or other statute or regulation; or(2) engage in research necessary to identify and analyze flaws and vulnerabilities of measures, systems or controls described in subsection (a), if these research activities are conducted to:(i) advance the state of knowledge in the field of computer 20250SB0355PN0293 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 system security; or(ii) assist in the development of a computer security product.(c) An operator, primary ticket platform or rights holder that suffers injury as a result of another person's violation of this section may bring a civil action against the person for damages for the injury, plus five hundred dollars ($500) for each ticket sale made in violation of this act, reasonable attorney fees and costs.(d) As used in this section:"Operator" means a person that owns, operates or controls a venue or that organizes or produces entertainment."Rights holder" means any of the following:(1) A person, including a venue, that has the initial ownership rights to sell a ticket to an event for which tickets for entry by the public are required.(2) With respect to a specific live event, a performing artist or team or an agent working on behalf of the performing artist or team."Venue" means a public or private facility at which the general public is admitted for a sporting event, concert, theater performance, amusement or other entertainment event.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0355PN0293 - 3 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223